Utah statutes.
34-45-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Firearm" has the same meaning as provided in Section 76-10-501.

(2)  "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in Section 41-1a-102.

(3)  "Person" means an individual, property owner, landlord, tenant, employer, business entity, or other legal entity.



Enacted by Chapter 379, 2009 General Session

